Wyoming, session 2026, HB0114.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 37-9-1401 through 37-9-1404 are
created to read:

ARTICLE 14
RAILROAD SAFETY

HB0114

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0207
37-9-1401. Definitions

(a) As used in this article:

(i) "Branch line" means a secondary railroad
track that branches off from a main line;

(ii) "Defect" includes, but is not limited to,
hot wheel bearings, hot wheels, deficient bearings detected
through acoustic means, dragging of equipment, excessive
height, excessive weight, a shifted load, a loose hose,
improper rail temperature or a deficient wheel condition;

(iii) "Director" means the director of the
department of transportation;

(iv) "Dragging equipment detector" means an
electronic device or other technology that monitors a
passing train to actively detect and alert operators of the
train of the existence of any objects dragging from the
train;

HB0114

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0207
(v) "Hot bearings detector" means an infrared
detector located along railroad tracks that is designed to
detect and alert the operators of a passing train about any
overheating of a train's bearings, axles or wheels;

(vi) "Main line" means as defined by 49 C.F.R.
part 236 or a successor regulation;

(vii) "Railroad" means any form of nonhighway
ground transportation that runs on rails or electromagnetic
guideways;

(viii) "Siding" or "passing track" means a
sidetrack with switches at both ends;

(ix) "Train" means one (1) or more locomotives,
coupled with or without cars, that require an air brake
test in accordance with 49 C.F.R. part 232 or part 238;

(x) "Wayside detector" or "wayside detector
system" means an electronic device or a series of connected
devices that scans passing trains, rolling stock and
HB0114

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0207
on-track equipment, and their component equipment and
parts, for defects.

37-9-1402. Train length; penalties.

(a) In addition to other administrative or criminal
remedies authorized by law, the director, after notice and
opportunity for hearing, shall assess a civil penalty
against a railroad company, corporation or employer as
provided in this section.

(b) No railroad company operating in the state of
Wyoming shall run or permit to run any train that:

(i) Exceeds eight thousand five hundred (8,500)
feet in length;

(ii) Exceeds the length of the shortest passing
track or siding on which it travels on any main line or
branch line; or

HB0114

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0207
(iii) Routinely or repeatedly blocks any highway
grade crossing for periods exceeding ten (10) minutes at
one (1) time.

(c) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this
section, any railroad company who willfully violates
paragraph (b)(i) or (ii) of this section shall be subject
to a civil penalty in an amount not less than five hundred
dollars ($500.00) per foot nor more than one thousand
dollars ($1,000.00) per foot of the amount of a train
exceeding the limitation set forth in paragraph (b)(i) or
(ii) of this section.

(d) Any railroad company who violates paragraph
(b)(iii) of this section shall be subject to a civil
penalty of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00)
and not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) per
violation. In assessing a penalty under this subsection,
the director shall consider the factors specified in
subsection (f) of this section.

(e) Any railroad company that commits a grossly
negligent violation of subsection (b) of this section or
HB0114

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0207
that has a pattern of repeated violations of subsection (b)
of this section and the violation caused an imminent threat
of death or injury to any person or caused death or injury
to any person shall be subject to a one (1) time civil
penalty not to exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars
($250,000.00).

(f) In determining the amount of any civil penalty
under this section the director shall consider:

(i) The nature, circumstances, extent and
gravity of the violation;

(ii) The degree of culpability, history of
violations, ability to pay and any effect on the violator's
ability to continue to do business;

(iii) Any other matters that justice requires.

(g) At the request of the director, the attorney
general may initiate a civil action to collect any civil
penalty imposed pursuant to this section. The attorney
general may bring a civil action in any court of competent
HB0114

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0207
jurisdiction. A civil action under this section shall be
commenced within three (3) years of the date of the
violation or within three (3) years of the latest violation
if a repeated offense is alleged.

37-9-1403. Wayside detection systems; report.

(a) A railroad company operating a train in Wyoming
shall install and maintain wayside detectors at intervals
of not less than every ten (10) miles on every main line it
operates in Wyoming. The wayside detectors shall be capable
of detecting defects as defined in W.S. 37-9-1401(a)(ii)
and of providing alerts directly to the cab of the train as
it passes the detector. Each wayside detector shall provide
a signal to the operator of a passing train that either no
defect was found or a report of any defect that was found.
The wayside detector system shall be fully operational at
all times when trains are being operated on the line.

(b) Each railroad company operating trains in Wyoming
shall provide adequate training for all train operators on
the proper use of wayside detectors, including remediation
procedures to be followed when a wayside detector sends an
HB0114

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0207
alert to the cab of a train they are operating. The
remediation procedures shall be specified in the railroad
company's instruction manual.

(c) At the end of the shift of any train operator in
Wyoming, the train operator shall file a report with the
railroad company and with a local labor safety
representative describing any of the following that
occurred during the shift of the train operator:

(i) Each alert received from a wayside detector
during the shift, including the nature of the alert and how
the operator responded to the alert;

(ii) If the train passed a wayside detector that
was not operational, the location of the wayside detector
that was not operational.

(d) On or before January 31, 2027, and on or before
January 31 of each year thereafter, a railroad operating a
main line in Wyoming and a person recognized by a labor
organization representing employees of the railroad as a
local labor safety representative shall submit a report to
HB0114

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0207
the department that includes, at minimum, the following
information:

(i) An overview of the types of, general
locations of and spacing between wayside detectors on main
lines in Wyoming;

(ii) Any improvements or upgrades to the wayside
detector system that the railroad implemented during the
year covered by the report;

(iii) A summary of:

(A) The number of alerts reported by train
operators during the year, categorized by the type of alert
reported;

(B) The responses to the alerts,
categorized by the type of response;

(C) The number of reports of wayside
detectors that were not operational at the time the train
passed the detector; and
HB0114

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0207

(D) The number of derailments that occurred
on the main line of the railroad company, categorized by
the cause of the derailment.

(e) Each report submitted under this section shall be
a public record.

37-9-1404. Visual track inspections.

(a) Each railroad company shall ensure that all main
line track designated within Wyoming for operation at class
3 speeds or higher under 49 C.F.R. part 213 is subject to
human visual inspection not less than two times each week.
Not less than one (1) calendar day shall elapse between
visual inspections under this subsection. The inspector
under this section shall be a person who is designated as a
qualified person under 49 C.F.R. part 213.

(b) Any defect or unsafe condition on a main line
track that is identified by an inspection under subsection
(a) of this section or by any other inspection, detection
or monitoring method shall be corrected, protected or
HB0114

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0207
removed from service immediately upon detection, consistent
with the requirements of 49 C.F.R. part 213.

(c) If a person conducting an inspection under
subsection (a) of this section finds any deviation from the
requirements of 49 C.F.R. part 213, the person shall:

(i) Immediately initiate remedial action; and

(ii) Have sole authority to authorize any
subsequent movements to facilitate repairs on track that is
out of service.

(d) Any railroad company who violates subsection (a)
of this section shall be subject to a civil penalty of not
less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) and not more
than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) for each week in
which the required visual inspections did not occur.

Section 2.

(a) The department of transportation is authorized up
to two (2) full-time positions for the period beginning
HB0114

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0207
July 1, 2026 and ending June 30, 2028 for the purposes of
implementing this act. It is the intent of the legislature
that the department of transportation include these
full-time positions in its standard budget for the
immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

(b) There is appropriated three hundred thousand
dollars ($300,000.00) from the general fund to the
department of transportation to be expended only for the
purpose of funding the positions authorized in subsection
(a) of this section. This appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose and any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
2028. It is the intent of the legislature that this
appropriation be included in the standard budget for the
department of transportation for the immediately succeeding
fiscal biennium.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0114